Hawaii statutes.
[§521-67] Tenant's remedy for failure by
landlord to disclose. If the landlord fails to comply with any disclosure
requirement specified in section 521-43 within ten days after proper demand
therefor by the tenant, the landlord shall be liable to the tenant for $100
plus reasonable attorney's fees. [L 1972, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next